dictionaries/sk/index.dic
baliť/EN
behať/EN
blikať/EN
bratať/EN
brzdiť/EN
buvinkať/EN
ceniť/EN
crkať/EN
cupkať/EN
čadiť/EN
časiť/EN
červenať/EN
čmudiť/EN
čvrlikať/EN
desiť/EN
docengať/EN
dofajčiť/EN
dohrať/EN
dojedať/EN
dokresliť/EN
dolapiť/EN
donivočiť/EN
doplaziť/EN
dopukať/EN
dorubiť/EN
dostačiť/EN
doškoliť/EN
doteperiť/EN
doučiť/EN
doznať/EN
drgať/EN
ďugať/EN
dušiť/EN
fackať/EN
fľochať/EN
fujazdiť/EN
guľatiť/EN
hajkať/EN
harkať/EN
hemžiť/EN
hlušiť/EN
hnusiť/EN
honiť/EN
hovoriť/EN
hrdiť/EN
hroziť/EN
hyzdiť/EN
chlpiť/EN
chumeliť/EN
chytiť/EN
jachať/EN
jastriť/EN
ježiť/EN
kaziť/EN
klepkať/EN
kloniť/EN
kolembať/EN
koriť/EN
krivdiť/EN
krvaviť/EN
kupčiť/EN
kvasiť/EN
kyvkať/EN
ľapotať/ETN
leptať/EN
logať/EN
lupkať/EN
mäkušiť/EN
mechriť/EN
mľaskať/EN
moriť/EN
mrhať/EN
mykať/EN
načakať/EN
naďabiť/EN
nadľahčiť/EN
nadrviť/EN
nafackať/EN
nahnevať/EN
nahromadiť/EN
najazdiť/EN
nakotiť/EN
nakypriť/EN
naložiť/EN
nanosiť/EN
napichať/EN
naprosiť/EN
narodiť/EN
naskladať/EN
nasrdiť/EN
nastreliť/EN
naštepiť/EN
natočiť/EN
navlhčiť/EN
nazberať/EN
nevražiť/EN
obalamutiť/EN
obhodiť/EN
obkolesiť/EN
obložiť/EN
obodriť/EN
obrodiť/EN
obštipkať/EN
obviniť/EN
očadiť/EN
odbočiť/EN
odčleniť/EN
odhaliť/EN
odchlpiť/EN
odklopiť/EN
odľahčiť/EN
odmocniť/EN
odnosiť/EN
odovzdať/EN
odplaviť/EN
odpredať/EN
odpykať/EN
odsadať/EN
odstreliť/EN
odtlačiť/EN
odvetiť/EN
odvykať/EN
odzvoniť/EN
ohraničiť/EN
ochudobniť/EN
okukať/EN
omeškať/EN
onikať/EN
operiť/EN
opodstatniť/EN
osadiť/EN
osloviť/EN
ostrihať/EN
ošetriť/EN
otepliť/EN
otupiť/EN
ovplyvniť/EN
ozvučiť/EN
pamätať/EN
pechoriť/EN
pigať/EN
plašiť/EN
plniť/EN
poberať/EN
počeštiť/EN
poddať/EN
podchytiť/EN
podložiť/EN
podperiť/EN
podrviť/EN
podupkať/EN
pohladiť/EN
pohodiť/EN
pochabiť/EN
pochvastať/ETN
pokarhať/EN
pokonať/EN
pokročiť/EN
polapať/EN
polichotiť/EN
pomakať/EN
pomľaskať/EN
pomstiť/EN
ponosiť/EN
popletať/EN
poprekladať/EN
popukať/EN
porodiť/EN
poruštiť/EN
poskočiť/EN
pospletať/EN
postiť/EN
postrihať/EN
pošklbkať/EN
pošťastiť/EN
poťažkať/EN
potrestať/ETN
potvrdiť/EN
povariť/EN
povolať/EN
povykladať/EN
pozapletať/EN
pozmeniť/EN
požmurkať/EN
prebehať/EN
precitať/EN
predčiť/EN
predchytiť/EN
predplatiť/EN
predurčiť/EN
prehmatať/EN
prechladiť/EN
prekonať/EN
prekvapiť/EN
preleštiť/EN
premokať/EN
preplatiť/EN
prepražiť/EN
presadať/EN
presnoriť/EN
presušiť/EN
pretackať/EN
pretlmočiť/EN
prevesiť/EN
prezvoniť/EN
priblížiť/EN
pridať/EN
prihodiť/EN
prichystať/EN
prikročiť/EN
prinožiť/EN
priplaviť/EN
priputnať/EN
prisiliť/EN
pristrojiť/EN
pritakať/EN
pritvoriť/EN
prizdobiť/EN
prskať/EN
pustošiť/EN
redaktorčiť/EN
robiť/EN
rozbaliť/EN
rozcvičiť/EN
rozdeliť/EN
rozfňukať/EN
rozhorčiť/EN
rozchlpiť/EN
rozkladať/EN
rozkutať/ETN
rozložiť/EN
rozmotať/ETN
rozohniť/EN
rozpaprčiť/EN
rozpleštiť/EN
rozpukať/EN
rozrobiť/EN
rozstrapatiť/EN
rozšľahať/EN
roztekať/EN
roztvoriť/EN
rozvesiť/EN
rozvrstviť/EN
rušať/EN
scivilniť/EN
semeniť/EN
schrumkať/EN
skaliť/EN
skomoliť/EN
skrotiť/EN
skvapalniť/EN
slniť/EN
smradiť/EN
sotiť/EN
spätiť/EN
splašiť/EN
sploštiť/EN
spojiť/EN
spotvoriť/EN
spresniť/EN
sprotiviť/EN
stačiť/EN
stemniť/EN
stlmiť/EN
strakatiť/EN
strestať/ETN
stroskotať/EN
stužiť/EN
sušiť/EN
šarapatiť/EN
šetriť/EN
škodiť/EN
šľachtiť/EN
šplechtať/ETN
štekliť/EN
štrngať/EN
šuchoriť/EN
táboriť/EN
tarasiť/EN
tenčiť/EN
tkať/EN
tmoliť/EN
trhať/EN
tupiť/EN
ubiť/EN
udeliť/EN
uhasiť/EN
uhradiť/EN
ujasniť/EN
ukoristiť/EN
ulepiť/EN
umiestniť/EN
upadať/EN
upotiť/EN
upustiť/EN
usadiť/EN
usliniť/EN
usušiť/EN
ušpiniť/EN
utkať/EN
utúliť/EN
uväzniť/EN
uzákoniť/EN
vadiť/EN
vďačiť/EN
veštiť/EN
víťaziť/EN
vlhčiť/EN
vodiť/EN
voziť/EN
vrhať/EN
vtekať/EN
vybaviť/EN
vycengať/EN
vyčarať/EN
vydariť/EN
vydrobiť/EN
vyhladiť/EN
vyhovoriť/EN
vychodiť/EN
vyjachtať/ETN
vyklebetiť/EN
vykoreniť/EN
vykrojiť/EN
vyľahčiť/EN
vyloviť/EN
vymetať/EN
vymykať/EN
vynikať/EN
vyparatiť/EN
vyplaziť/EN
vypraviť/EN
vypudiť/EN
vyrobiť/EN
vysekať/EN
vysmoliť/EN
vystrčiť/EN
vysvetliť/EN
vyšľachtiť/EN
vyťažiť/EN
vytopiť/EN
vyťukať/EN
vyvenčiť/EN
vyvoziť/EN
vyznamenať/EN
vzdať/EN
vzpažiť/EN
zabaliť/EN
zabočiť/EN
zacengať/EN
zacvakať/EN
začleniť/EN
zadlžiť/EN
zadymiť/EN
zahabkať/EN
zahlaholiť/EN
zahodiť/EN
zahromžiť/EN
zachlopiť/EN
zaistiť/EN
zajojkať/EN
zakloktať/ETN
zakotviť/EN
zakuckať/EN
zakvickať/EN
zaločkať/EN
zamaškrtiť/EN
zamihať/EN
zamračiť/EN
zanikať/EN
zaobstarať/EN
zapariť/EN
zaperiť/EN
zapletať/EN
zapraskať/EN
zapudiť/EN
zarastať/EN
zarosiť/EN
zaskliť/EN
zasmoliť/EN
zastaviť/EN
zasvätiť/EN
zašeptať/ETN
zaškrtiť/EN
zaštrkať/EN
zašveholiť/EN
zaťažiť/EN
zatočiť/EN
zaučiť/EN
zaveliť/EN
zavodniť/EN
zazeleniť/EN
zažehnať/EN
zberať/EN
zdaniť/EN
zdôrazniť/EN
združiť/EN
zeleniť/EN
zhodiť/EN
zhrčiť/EN
zimiť/EN
zjaviť/EN
zlacniť/EN
zlomiť/EN
zmastiť/EN
zmetať/EN
zmraštiť/EN
zmydelniť/EN
znať/EN
znemravniť/EN
zneuctiť/EN
zobkať/EN
zohaviť/EN
zoskočiť/EN
zostriť/EN
zošľahať/EN
zotročiť/EN
zrastať/EN
zrovnať/EN
zútulniť/EN
zvedečtiť/EN
zvetriť/EN
zvnútorniť/EN
zvýhodniť/EN
ženiť/EN
žmurkať/EN
